Massachusetts, session 194th, S2395.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 701 of the acts of 1960, as most recently amended by
sections 3 and 4 of chapter 429 of the acts of 2002, is hereby further amended in the second
paragraph:
by striking the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the word “the;” and by adding
the following sentence at the end thereof:-
No member shall serve more than three full terms; provided, that a member appointed to
fill a vacancy may serve three full terms after serving the unexpired portion of the former
member.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding section 3 of chapter 701 of the acts of 1960, as amended
herein, members serving on the Steamship Authority Board who have served three full terms as
of the effective date of this act may complete the remainder of their term and may serve an
additional term immediately after their current term expires.
of 1